Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.150

Washington scholars' program—Selection of scholars and scholars-alternates—Notification process—Certificates—Awards ceremony.

Each year, three Washington scholars and one Washington scholars-alternate shall be selected from the students nominated under RCW 28A.600.140, except that during fiscal year 2007, no more than two scholars plus one alternate may be selected. The office of student financial assistance shall notify the students so designated, their high school principals, the legislators of their respective districts, and the governor when final selections have been made.

The office, in conjunction with the governor's office, shall prepare appropriate certificates to be presented to the Washington scholars and the Washington scholars-alternates. An awards ceremony at an appropriate time and place shall be planned by the office in cooperation with the Washington association of secondary school principals, and with the approval of the governor.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 129; 2005 c 518 s 916; 1999 c 159 s 2; 1985 c 370 s 35; 1981 c 54 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.58.830.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2005 c 518: See note following RCW 28A.600.110.

Findings—Intent—1999 c 159: "The legislature finds that approximately thirty-five percent of the recipients of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 choose to enroll in an out-of-state college and therefore do not use the grants that would have been available to them under RCW 28B.80.245 had they chosen to attend a college or university in the state of Washington. It is the intent of the legislature to require high school seniors who are announced as recipients of the Washington scholars award to demonstrate in a timely manner that they will be using any grants they may receive with their awards to enroll in a college or university in Washington state during the fall term of the same year in which they receive the award. Any grants not used by initial recipients should be awarded to alternate recipients who must also demonstrate in a timely manner that they will be using their grants to enroll in a Washington college or university in Washington state during the fall term." [ 1999 c 159 s 1.]

Severability—1981 c 54: See note following RCW 28A.600.100.